Hawaii statutes.
[§150A-44] Summary suspension.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department may cause the immediate
suspension of an importer's certificate, subject to subsequent notice and
hearing or other adequate procedures, upon the department's determination that
there is an impending danger of escape or release of, or contamination from or
exposure to microorganisms imported pursuant to certificate so as to present a
threat to public health or safety, animal health, agriculture, horticulture, or
the environment, or in the event of a medical emergency or agricultural or
ecological disaster resulting from escape or release of, or contamination from
or exposure to microorganisms imported pursuant to certificate.

The department may order the summary suspension
of the certificate for a period not to exceed twenty days. The order of
suspension shall be served upon the certified importer at the same time as the
notice of hearing for further suspension or revocation and the hearing shall be
scheduled prior to the expiration of the order of suspension. The period of
suspension prior to the hearing shall not be extended beyond twenty days except
upon the request of the importer for a reasonable continuance to adequately
prepare the importer's defense. Any attempt by the importer to continue the
certified activity while the certificate has been summarily suspended shall of
itself be sufficient to warrant a permanent revocation of the certificate and
shall subject the importer to all penalties prescribed by this chapter or any
rule or order of the department. [L 1999, c 177, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next